Utah statutes.
17C-2-701.   Railroad crossings within urban renewal project area.

(1)  Notwithstanding Section 54-4-15 or other provision of law, and except as provided in Subsection (2), the Department of Transportation created in Section 72-1-201 may not prohibit or close, temporarily or permanently, a public road or highway crossing by a railroad or street railroad that is located within the boundaries of an urban renewal project area that includes some or all of an inactive industrial site.

(2)  The Department of Transportation may prohibit or close a crossing described in Subsection (1) if the department obtains the advance written consent of the agency that created the urban renewal project area where the crossing is located.

